tools/nvda/louis/tables/fil-g2.ctb
match %[^_~]%<* tayog (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2345-1245
match %[^_~]%<* talakay (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2345-13
match %[^_~]%<* talata (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2345-123
match %[^_~]%<* tagumpay (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2345-1234
match %[^_~]%<* trabaho (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2345-1235

# Letter W

match %[^_~]%<* watawat (['’]([DSTdst]|ll|[rv]e|LL|[RV]E))?%>*%[^_~] 2456-2456

# Repeatition A

begmidword mama 45-134
begmidword nana 45-1345
begmidword nganga 45-126
begmidword rara 45-1235
begmidword sasa 45-234
begmidword tata 45-2345
begmidword wawa 45-2456
begmidword yaya 45-13456

midword bababa 456-12
midword dadada 456-145
midword gagaga 456-1245
midword hahaha 456-125
midword kakaka 456-13
midword lalala 456-123
begword mamama 456-134
begmidword nanana 456-1345
midword nganganga 456-126
midword papapa 456-1234
midword rarara 456-1235
midword sasasa 456-234
midword tatata 456-2345
midword wawawa 456-2456
midword yayaya 456-13456

# Repeatition I

always bibi 16-12
always didi 16-145
always gigi 16-1245
always hihi 16-125
always kiki 16-13
always lili 16-123
always mimi 16-134
always nini 16-1345
midendword ngingi 16-126
partword pipi 16-1234
always riri 16-1235
always sisi 16-234
always titi 16-2345
always wiwi 16-2456
always yiyi 16-13456

# Repeatition U

midword bubu 46-12
midword dudu 46-145
midword gugu 46-1245
midword huhu 46-125
midword kuku 46-13
midword lulu 46-123
midword mumu 46-134
midword nunu 46-1345
midword ngungu 46-126
midword pupu 46-1234
midword ruru 46-1235
midword susu 46-234
midword wuwu 46-2456
midword yuyu 46-13456

midword bububu 56-12
midword dududu 56-145
midword gugugu 56-1245
midword huhuhu 56-125
midword kukuku 56-13
midword lululu 56-123
midword mumumu 56-134
midword nununu 56-1345
midword ngungungu 56-126
midword pupupu 56-1234
midword rururu 56-1235
midword sususu 56-234
midword tututu 56-2345
midword wuwuwu 56-2456
midword yuyuyu 56-13456
